apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
  <pardef n="ħ/axix__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>axix</l><r>axix<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>xejjex</l><r>axix<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/aqrut__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aqrut</l><r>aqrut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>qaret</l><r>aqrut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/elb__n_m">
    <e><p><l>elb</l><r>elb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lieb</l><r>elb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ft/ira__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ira</l><r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ajjar</l><r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="d/arsa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>arsa</l><r>arsa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ras</l><r>arsa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="tib/na__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>na</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>en</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="pin/na__n_f">
    <e><p><l>na</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>en</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="g/ozz__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ozz</l><r>ozz<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>zuz</l><r>ozz<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċ/orma__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>orma</l><r>orma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>orom</l><r>orma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rum</l><r>orma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="/ikħal__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ikħal</l><r>ikħal<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>koħol</l><r>ikħal<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/inna__n_f">
    <e><p><l>inna</l><r>inna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nien</l><r>inna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għ/aġeb__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aġeb</l><r>aġeb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>oġġieba</l><r>aġeb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="beż/buża__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>buża</l><r>buża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bżie</l><r>buża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/appun__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>appun</l><r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>papan</l><r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>papen</l><r>appun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="sk/arpell__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>arpell</l><r>arpell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rapel</l><r>arpell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riepel</l><r>arpell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="gid/ba__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ba</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>eb</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċ/arruta__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>arruta</l><r>arruta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>raret</l><r>arruta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieret</l><r>arruta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għ/ama__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ama</l><r>ama<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>omja</l><r>ama<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="toq/ba__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ba</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ob</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għ/ajn__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ajn</l><r>ajn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ejun</l><r>ajn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/ewt__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ewt</l><r>ewt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wiet</l><r>ewt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="/iblah__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>iblah</l><r>iblah<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>boloh</l><r>iblah<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/aħħar__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aħħar</l><r>aħħar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ħaħar</l><r>aħħar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/arfusa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>arfusa</l><r>arfusa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rafes</l><r>arfusa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għ/onq__n_m">
    <e><p><l>onq</l><r>onq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>enuq</l><r>onq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċer/ċur__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ċur</l><r>ċur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ċrie</l><r>ċur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/uq__n_m">
    <e><p><l>uq</l><r>uq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wieq</l><r>uq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/aqaf__n_m">
    <e><p><l>aqaf</l><r>aqaf<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>oqfa</l><r>aqaf<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="far/sa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>sa</l><r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>es</l><r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="pex/pux__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>pux</l><r>pux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>pxie</l><r>pux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="r/aġel__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aġel</l><r>aġel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ġiel</l><r>aġel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċ/appella__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>appella</l><r>appella<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>papel</l><r>appella<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>piepel</l><r>appella<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/orq__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>orq</l><r>orq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieq</l><r>orq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/us__n_m">
    <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wies</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="n/iżla__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>iżla</l><r>iżla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>żul</l><r>iżla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="/iżraq__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>iżraq</l><r>iżraq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>żoroq</l><r>iżraq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="pes/pus__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>pus</l><r>pus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>psie</l><r>pus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/anut__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>anut</l><r>anut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wienet</l><r>anut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/antar__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>antar</l><r>antar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>natar</l><r>antar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/anfud__n_m">
    <e><p><l>anfud</l><r>anfud<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>niefed</l><r>anfud<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="x/riek__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>riek</l><r>riek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>orok</l><r>riek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="ċorma" c="large number" ><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/orma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="raġel" c="man" ><i>r</i><par n="r/aġel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għonq" c="neck" ><i>għ</i><par n="għ/onq__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="suq" c="market" ><i>s</i><par n="s/uq__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mewt" c="death" ><i>m</i><par n="m/ewt__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kanna" c="pipe" ><i>kan</i><par n="tib/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tibna" c="straw" ><i>tib</i><par n="tib/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qantar" c="heavy load" ><i>q</i><par n="q/antar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għaġeb" c="fussy person" ><i>għ</i><par n="għ/aġeb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qorq" c="sandal" ><i>q</i><par n="q/orq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għajn" c="fountain" ><i>għ</i><par n="għ/ajn__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="għassa" c="police station" ><i>għas</i><par n="far/sa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pexpux" c="naughty child" ><i>pex</i><par n="pex/pux__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nassa" c="trap" ><i>nas</i><par n="far/sa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ingassa" c="noose" ><i>ingas</i><par n="far/sa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="għama" c="blind person" ><i>għ</i><par n="għ/ama__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rassa" c="crowd" ><i>ras</i><par n="far/sa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħanut" c="shop" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/anut__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħotba" c="matchmaker" ><i>ħot</i><par n="toq/ba__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kobba" c="ball of thread" ><i>kob</i><par n="toq/ba__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="massa" c="mass" ><i>mas</i><par n="far/sa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xriek" c="stone slab" ><i>x</i><par n="x/riek__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ftira" c="type of bread" ><i>ft</i><par n="ft/ira__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ċarruta" c="piece of cloth" ><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/arruta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħaxix" c="vegetables/grass" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/axix__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mus" c="pocket knife" ><i>m</i><par n="m/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ikħal" c="blue" ><i></i><par n="/ikħal__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="saqaf" c="roof" ><i>s</i><par n="s/aqaf__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerċur" c="person of vulgar habits" ><i>ċer</i><par n="ċer/ċur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gozz" c="heap" ><i>g</i><par n="g/ozz__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qanfud" c="hedgehog" ><i>q</i><par n="q/anfud__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="darsa" c="molar" ><i>d</i><par n="d/arsa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="niżla" c="slope" ><i>n</i><par n="n/iżla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="farsa" c="farce" ><i>far</i><par n="far/sa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pespus" c="fledgling bird" ><i>pes</i><par n="pes/pus__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skarpell" c="chisel" ><i>sk</i><par n="sk/arpell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="toqba" c="hole" ><i>toq</i><par n="toq/ba__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerna" c="grouper" ><i>ċer</i><par n="tib/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kelb" c="dog" ><i>k</i><par n="k/elb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gidba" c="lie" ><i>gid</i><par n="gid/ba__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="iżraq" c="azure" ><i></i><par n="/iżraq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="beżbuża" c="lock of hair" ><i>beż</i><par n="beż/buża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċappella" c="round stone" ><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/appella__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="karfusa" c="celery" ><i>k</i><par n="k/arfusa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="girna" c="small room in a field" ><i>gir</i><par n="tib/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sinna" c="tooth" ><i>s</i><par n="s/inna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pinna" c="pen" ><i>pin</i><par n="pin/na__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gżira" c="island" ><i>gż</i><par n="ft/ira__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="għadira" c="pool" ><i>għad</i><par n="ft/ira__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="saħħar" c="wizard" ><i>s</i><par n="s/aħħar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maqrut" c="pastry filled with dates" ><i>m</i><par n="m/aqrut__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="iblah" c="idiot" ><i></i><par n="/iblah__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kappun" c="hood worn by babies" ><i>k</i><par n="k/appun__n_GD"/></e>
